Georgia, session 2025_26, HB594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the board of commissioners of Baker County, approved August 8, 1917 (Ga.
L. 1917, p. 306), as amended, is amended by revising Section 5 as follows:
"SECTION 5
The board of commissioners shall meet on the first Tuesday of each month and on such other
days as it may determine. The board shall, by local ordinance, set a location and time for
such meetings."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 594
- 1 -